Mississippi, session 2026, HB1520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Mississippi Department of Archives and History is hereby authorized and empowered to donate and transfer title to the Dancing Rabbit Creek Treaty property to the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians (MBCI). The Dancing Rabbit Creek Treaty property is historically significant to the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians and the MBCI has expressed interest in the property. The Dancing Rabbit Creek Treaty property is more particularly described as follows:  Commence on the NE corner of the W 1/2 of the E 1/2 of the NW 1/4 of Section 3, Township 13, North Range 15 East, said point being Fair Lumber Company corner, thence run South 1 degree 12 minutes East along Fair Lumber Company line 14.81 chains to center of road, run thence along center of road South 34 degrees West 4.88 chains, thence run South 30 degrees West along center of road 1.83 chains, thence run South 7 degrees East 2.76 chains, thence run West 8 degrees North 7.00 chains, thence run North 17 degrees East 20.12 chains, thence run North 10 degrees West 6.00 chains, thence run North 43 degrees East 21.00 chains, thence run East 43 degrees South 5.15 chains, thence run South 29 degrees West 4.43 chains, thence run South 37 degrees West 13.75 chains to Fair Lumber Company line, thence run West 1/2 degree South along Fair Lumber Company line 2.40 chains to point of beginning all being in the NW 1/4 of Section 3, Township 13 North, Range 15 East and in the SW 1/4 of Section 34, Township 14 North, Range 15 East, Noxubee County, Mississippi, and containing 28.3 acres, more or less, whether correctly described or not. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.